Arkansas, session 2025, HB1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - REYNOLDS CENTER ON AGING, BOOZMAN COLLEGE
OF PUBLIC HEALTH, BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE, AND THE AREA HEALTH ED. CENTER -
HELENA. There is hereby established for the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences - Reynolds Center on Aging, Boozman College of Public
Health, Biosciences Institute, and Area Health Education Center - Helena for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
*HAR042*
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
UAMS REYNOLDS CENTER ON AGING
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Project/Program Administrator 5
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
Executive Assistant $99,405
(2) Administrative Support Pool 1
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(3) Faculty Pool 19
Professor $243,519
Associate Professor $224,720
Assistant Professor $212,176
Instructor $170,490
(4) Education Coordinator 1 $175,248
(5) Senior Research Assistant 1 $115,289
UAMS BOOZMAN COLLEGE OF PUBLIC HEALTH
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(6) Dean 1 $361,971
(7) Associate Dean 1 $244,970
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
(8) Project/Program Administrator 2
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
Executive Assistant $99,405
(9) Research Technologist 1 $78,713
(10) Administrative Support Pool 4
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(11) Department Chairperson 5 $256,072
(12) Faculty Pool 6
Professor $243,519
Associate Professor $224,720
Assistant Professor $212,176
ARKANSAS BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(13) Director of Biosciences Institute 1 $380,697
(14) Research Technologist 6 $78,713
(15) Research Technician 4 $53,175
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(16) Faculty Pool 24
Research Professor $237,829
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
Associate Research Professor $224,718
Assistant Research Professor $212,176
Research Instructor $145,990
(17) Post Doctoral Fellow 6 $147,091
(18) Graduate Assistant 4 $57,379
UAMS AREA HEALTH EDUCATION CENTER - HELENA
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(19) Project/Program Administrator 17
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
Executive Assistant $99,405
(20) Administrative Support Pool 2
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(21) Assistant Professor 1 $206,357
(22) Clinic Instructor 1 $165,817
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 113

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - DONALD W. REYNOLDS CENTER ON AGING. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences,
to be payable from the Targeted State Needs Program Account of the Tobacco
Settlement Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences - Donald W. Reynolds Center on
Aging for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,292,959
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 316,765
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 603,713
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 52,128
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 55,231
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,320,796

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - FAY W. BOOZMAN COLLEGE OF PUBLIC HEALTH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the Targeted State Needs Program Account of the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences - Fay W. Boozman College
of Public Health for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,561,276
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 564,670
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,195,946

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS BIOSCIENCES INSTITUTE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
be payable from the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account of the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences - Arkansas Biosciences
Institute for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,407,267
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 337,875
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,042,499
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 23,960
(C) PROF. FEES 37,940
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,434,680
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ARKANSAS CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL
RESEARCH PROGRAM 1,896,736
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,180,957

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - AREA HEALTH EDUCATION CENTER IN HELENA.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the Targeted State Needs Program Account of the
Tobacco Settlement Program Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences - Area Health Education
Center in Helena for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,237,959
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 316,765
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 603,713
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 52,128
(C) PROF. FEES 25,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,235,565

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL RESEARCH PROGRAM. In any fiscal year, if the funds
received by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the Arkansas
Biosciences Institute in the Arkansas Biosciences Institute appropriation in
this Act are less than the total amount appropriated, the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences shall provide no less than thirty-three and
one-third percent (33 and 1/3%) of the available funds for the Arkansas
Children's Hospital Research Program. Otherwise, the Arkansas Children’s
Hospital Research Program line item appropriation in the Arkansas Biosciences
Institute appropriation in this Act shall be funded in total or Arkansas
Children’s Hospital Chief Executive Officer may request that the University
of Arkansas for Medical Sciences transfer such funds each fiscal year from
the Arkansas Biosciences Institute Program Account to the Department of Human
Services Grants Fund Account. The transferred funds shall be used to match
federal funds used for Supplemental Medicaid payments to Arkansas Children’s
Hospital.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
RESTRICTIONS. The appropriations provided in this act shall not be
transferred under the provisions of Arkansas Code 19-4-522, but only as
provided by this act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISIONS. The state-supported institution of higher education in this act
may transfer appropriations between the various line items within each
appropriation contained in this appropriation act. Such transfers shall be
made only after the approval of the Division of Higher Education and the
01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The General Assembly has determined that the institution in this act could
be operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that institution
and that flexibility is being accomplished by providing authority to transfer
between items of appropriation made by this act. Since the General Assembly
has granted the institution broad powers under the transfer of
appropriations, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization of the transfers by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee in the
utilization of the transfer authority. Therefore, the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
POSITIONS. (a) Nothing in this act shall be construed as a commitment of the
State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or institutions to continue funding
any position paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement in the event
that Tobacco Settlement funds are not sufficient to finance the position.
(b) State funds will not be used to replace Tobacco Settlement funds when
such funds expire, unless appropriated by the General Assembly and authorized
by the Governor.
(c) A disclosure of the language contained in (a) and (b) of this Section
shall be made available to all new hire and current positions paid from the
proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement by the Tobacco Settlement Commission.
(d) Whenever applicable the information contained in (a) and (b) of this
Section shall be included in the employee handbook and/or Professional
Services Contract paid from the proceeds of the Tobacco Settlement.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042

HB1267
SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds authorized by this act
shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency and funds made
available by law for the support of such appropriations; and the restrictions
of the State Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures
Law, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors,
and other fiscal control laws of this State, where applicable, and
regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration, as
authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in disbursement of said
funds.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly that any funds
disbursed under the authority of the appropriations contained in this act
shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for which this act was
adopted, as evidenced by Initiated Act 1 of 2000, the Agency Requests,
Executive Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the
budget manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration,
letters, or summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and
adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

01/27/2025 1:55:09 PM HAR042